Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2716
Expenditures; budget.

Following the adoption of an ordinance establishing an economic development program, the amount to be expended on the program for the ensuing year or biennial period shall be fixed at the time of making the annual or biennial budget required by law and shall be included in the budget.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 17;

Laws 2000, LB 1116, § 16.